test/src/morphology/N-tueue30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tüü: # Noun (30) tüü 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tüü+N+Sg+Nom: tüü
     tüü+N+Sg+Gen: tüü
     tüü+N+Sg+Par: tüüd
     tüü+N+Sg+Ill: [tüühü, tühüq]
     tüü+N+Pl+Gen: töie
     tüü+N+Pl+Par: töid
     tüü+N+Pl+Ill: [töihte, töihe]
     tüü+N+Pl+All: töile
